Maryland, session 2026, HB0401.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
7–302.
(e) (4) (i) Except as provided in paragraphs (5) and (6) of this subsection,
from the fines collected by a political subdivision as a result of violations enforced by speed
monitoring systems, work zone speed control systems, stop sign monitoring systems, school
bus monitoring cameras, bus lane monitoring systems, or noise abatement monitoring
systems, a political subdivision:
1. May recover the costs of implementing and administering
the speed monitoring systems, work zone speed control systems, stop sign monitoring
systems, school bus monitoring cameras, bus lane monitoring systems, or noise abatement
monitoring systems; and
2. Subject to subparagraphs [(ii), (iii), and (iv)] (II)
THROUGH (VIII) of this paragraph, may spend any remaining balance solely for public
safety purposes, including pedestrian or highway safety programs.
(ii) 1. For any fiscal year, if the balance remaining from the fines
collected by a political subdivision as a result of violations enforced by speed monitoring
systems, after the costs of implementing and administering the systems are recovered in
accordance with subparagraph (i)1 of this paragraph, is greater than 10% of the total
revenues of the political subdivision for the fiscal year, the political subdivision shall remit
any funds that exceed 10% of the total revenues to the Comptroller.
2. The Comptroller shall deposit any money remitted under
this subparagraph to the General Fund of the State.
(iii) The fines collected by Prince George’s County as a result of
violations enforced by speed monitoring systems on Maryland Route 210 shall be remitted
to the Comptroller for distribution to the State Highway Administration to be used solely
to assist in covering the costs of:
1. Examining the engineering, infrastructure, and other
relevant factors that may contribute to safety issues on Maryland Route 210 in Prince
George’s County;
2. Reporting its findings and recommendations on any
solutions to these safety issues; and
3. Implementing any solutions to these safety issues.

HOUSE BILL 401 3
(iv) 1. From the fines collected by Baltimore City as a result of
violations enforced by speed monitoring systems on Interstate 83, any balance remaining
after the allocation of fines under subparagraph (i)1 of this paragraph shall be remitted to
the Comptroller for distribution to the Baltimore City Department of Transportation to be
used solely to assist in covering the cost of roadway improvements on Interstate 83 in
Baltimore City.
2. Fines remitted to the Baltimore City Department of
Transportation under subsubparagraph 1 of this subparagraph are supplemental to and
are not intended to take the place of funding that would otherwise be appropriated for uses
described under subsubparagraph 1 of this subparagraph.
(v) From the fines collected by Anne Arundel County as a result of
violations enforced by speed monitoring systems on Maryland Route 175 (Jessup Road)
between the Maryland Route 175/295 interchange and the Anne Arundel County–Howard
County line, any balance remaining after the allocation of fines under subparagraph (i)1 of
this paragraph shall be remitted to the Comptroller for distribution to the State Highway
Administration to be used solely to assist in covering the cost of speed reduction measures
and roadway and pedestrian safety improvements on Maryland Route 175 (Jessup Road)
between the Maryland Route 175/295 interchange and the Anne Arundel County–Howard
County line.
(vi) From the fines collected by the Town of Oxford as a result of
violations enforced by speed monitoring systems at the intersection of Maryland Route 333
(Oxford Road) and Bonfield Avenue in Talbot County, any balance remaining after the
allocation of fines under subparagraph (i)1 of this paragraph shall be remitted to the
Comptroller for distribution to the State Highway Administration to be used solely to assist
in covering the cost of roadway and pedestrian safety improvements in and around the
intersection of Maryland Route 333 (Oxford Road) and Bonfield Avenue.
(vii) 1. From the fines collected by Montgomery County as a result
of violations enforced by speed monitoring systems placed in accordance with §
21–809(b)(1)(vi)7 of the Transportation Article, any balance remaining after the allocation
of fines under subparagraph (i)1 of this paragraph shall be used to fund the study, design,
and construction of safety–related projects on roadways or intersections in Montgomery
County that have been identified in the county’s or State’s most recent Strategic Highway
Safety Plan or Vision Zero Plan as roadways or intersections that are at high risk for motor
vehicle crashes that result in serious bodily injury or death.
2. From the fines collected by a municipal government in
Montgomery County as a result of violations enforced by speed monitoring systems placed
in accordance with § 21–809(b)(1)(vi)7 of the Transportation Article, any balance remaining
after the allocation of fines under subparagraph (i)1 of this paragraph shall be used to fund
the study, design, and construction of safety–related projects on roadways or intersections
in the municipality that have been identified in the municipality’s, county’s, or State’s most
recent Strategic Highway Safety Plan, Vision Zero Plan, or similar road safety plan as

HOUSE BILL 401
roadways or intersections that are at high risk for motor vehicle crashes that result in
serious bodily injury or death.
(VIII) FROM THE FINES COLLECTED BY PRINCE GEORGE’S
COUNTY AS A RESULT OF VIOLATIONS ENFORCED BY SPEED MONITORING SYSTEMS
ON MARYLAND ROUTE 5 IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY, ANY BALANCE REMAINING
AFTER THE ALLOCATION OF FINES UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I)1 OF THIS PARAGRAPH
SHALL BE REMITTED TO THE COMPTROLLER FOR DISTRIBUTION TO THE STATE
HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION TO BE USED, IN CONSULTATION WITH PRINCE
GEORGE’S COUNTY, SOLELY FOR STATE AND LOCAL HIGHWAY AND PEDESTRIAN
SAFETY IMPROVEMENTS ON AND IN THE VICINITY OF MARYLAND ROUTE 5 IN
PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY.
Article – Transportation
21–809.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(9) “Speed monitoring system” means a device with one or more motor
vehicle sensors producing recorded images of motor vehicles traveling at speeds at least 12
miles per hour above the posted speed limit.
(b) (1) (i) 1. A speed monitoring system may not be used by a local
jurisdiction under this section unless its use is authorized by the governing body of the local
jurisdiction by local law enacted after reasonable notice and a public hearing.
2. The State Highway Administration may use speed
monitoring systems on Interstate 83 in Baltimore County and Interstate 695 in Baltimore
County in accordance with this section.
3. The Maryland Transportation Authority may use speed
monitoring systems on Maryland Route 200 (Intercounty Connector) in accordance with
this section.
(v) An ordinance or resolution adopted by the governing body of a
local jurisdiction under this paragraph shall provide that, if the local jurisdiction moves or
places a mobile or stationary speed monitoring system to or at a location where a speed
monitoring system had not previously been moved or placed, the local jurisdiction may not
issue a citation for a violation recorded by that speed monitoring system:
1. Until signage is installed in accordance with
subparagraph (viii) of this paragraph; and
2. For at least the first 15 calendar days after the signage is
installed.

HOUSE BILL 401 5
(vi) This section applies to a violation of this subtitle recorded by a
speed monitoring system that meets the requirements of this subsection and has been
placed:
1. In Anne Arundel County, Montgomery County, or Prince
George’s County, on a highway in a residential district, as defined in § 21–101 of this title,
with a maximum posted speed limit of 35 miles per hour, which speed limit was established
using generally accepted traffic engineering practices;
2. In a school zone with a posted speed limit of at least 20
miles per hour;
3. In Prince George’s County:
A. Subject to subparagraph (vii)1 of this paragraph, on
Maryland Route 210 (Indian Head Highway); [or]
B. ON MARYLAND ROUTE 5; OR
C. On that part of a highway located within the grounds of
an institution of higher education as defined in § 10–101(h) of the Education Article, or
within one–half mile of the grounds of a building or property used by the institution of
higher education where generally accepted traffic and engineering practices indicate that
motor vehicle, pedestrian, or bicycle traffic is substantially generated or influenced by the
institution of higher education;
4. Subject to subparagraph (vii)2 of this paragraph, on
Interstate 83 in Baltimore City;
5. In Anne Arundel County, on Maryland Route 175 (Jessup
Road) between the Maryland Route 175/295 interchange and the Anne Arundel
County–Howard County line;
6. Subject to subparagraph (vii)3 of this paragraph, at the
intersection of Maryland Route 333 (Oxford Road) and Bonfield Avenue in Talbot County;
7. Subject to subparagraph (vii)4 of this paragraph, by the
State Highway Administration on Interstate 83 in Baltimore County or on Interstate 695
in Baltimore County;
8. By the Maryland Transportation Authority on Maryland
Route 200 (Intercounty Connector) in Montgomery County; or
9. Subject to subparagraph (xii) of this paragraph, in
Montgomery County on a highway identified in the municipality’s, county’s, or State’s most

HOUSE BILL 401
recent Strategic Highway Safety Plan or Vision Zero Plan as a highway that is at high risk
for motor vehicle crashes that result in serious bodily injury or death.
(vii) 1. Not more than six mobile or stationary speed monitoring
systems may be placed on Maryland Route 210 (Indian Head Highway).
2. A. Subject to subsubsubparagraph B of this
subsubparagraph, not more than four speed monitoring systems may be placed on
Interstate 83 in Baltimore City.
B. Not more than one speed monitoring system in each
direction may be in operation at the same time on Interstate 83 in Baltimore City.
3. Not more than one speed monitoring system may be placed
at the intersection of Maryland Route 333 (Oxford Road) and Bonfield Avenue in Talbot
County.
4. The State Highway Administration:
A. May place and use a speed monitoring system on
Interstate 83 in Baltimore County or Interstate 695 in Baltimore County under this section
only at a location it identifies as being at high risk for motor vehicle crashes that result in
death or serious bodily injury;
B. I. May not place or use more than three speed
monitoring systems in each direction on Interstate 83 in Baltimore County; and
II. May not place or use more than four speed monitoring
systems in each direction on Interstate 695 in Baltimore County; and
C. May not place or use a speed monitoring system
authorized under this section within 5 miles of another speed monitoring system authorized
under this section operating in the same direction.
(viii) Before activating a speed monitoring system, the local
jurisdiction, the State Highway Administration, or the Maryland Transportation
Authority, as appropriate, shall:
1. Publish notice of the location of the speed monitoring
system on its website and in a newspaper of general circulation in the jurisdiction;
2. Ensure that each sign that designates a school zone is
proximate to a sign that:
A. Indicates that speed monitoring systems are in use in the
school zone; and

HOUSE BILL 401 7
B. Is in accordance with the manual for and the specifications
for a uniform system of traffic control devices adopted by the State Highway Administration
under § 25–104 of this article;
3. With regard to a speed monitoring system established on
Maryland Route 210 (Indian Head Highway) OR MARYLAND ROUTE 5 in Prince George’s
County, based on proximity to an institution of higher education under subparagraph (vi)3
of this paragraph, on Interstate 83 in Baltimore City, in Anne Arundel County on Maryland
Route 175 (Jessup Road) between the Maryland Route 175/295 interchange and the Anne
Arundel County–Howard County line, at the intersection of Maryland Route 333 (Oxford
Road) and Bonfield Avenue in Talbot County, on Interstate 83 in Baltimore County or
Interstate 695 in Baltimore County, or on Maryland Route 200 (Intercounty Connector) in
Montgomery County, ensure that all speed limit signs approaching and within the segment
of highway on which the speed monitoring system is located include signs that:
A. Are in accordance with the manual and specifications for
a uniform system of traffic control devices adopted by the State Highway Administration
under § 25–104 of this article; and
B. Indicate that a speed monitoring system is in use; and
4. With regard to a speed monitoring system placed on
Maryland Route 210 (Indian Head Highway) OR MARYLAND ROUTE 5 in Prince George’s
County, Interstate 83 in Baltimore City, in Anne Arundel County on Maryland Route 175
(Jessup Road) between the Maryland Route 175/295 interchange and the Anne Arundel
County–Howard County line, at the intersection of Maryland Route 333 (Oxford Road) and
Bonfield Avenue in Talbot County, on Interstate 83 in Baltimore County or Interstate 695
in Baltimore County, or on Maryland Route 200 (Intercounty Connector) in Montgomery
County, ensure that each sign that indicates that a speed monitoring system is in use is
proximate to a device that displays a real–time posting of the speed at which a driver is
traveling.
(c) (1) Unless the driver of the motor vehicle received a citation from a police
officer at the time of the violation, the owner or, in accordance with subsection (f)(4) of this
section, the driver of a motor vehicle is subject to a civil penalty if the motor vehicle is
recorded by a speed monitoring system while being operated in violation of this subtitle.
(2) (i) Except as provided in subparagraphs (ii) and (iii) of this
paragraph, a civil penalty under this subsection may not exceed:
1. If the citation alleges that the driver of the motor vehicle
exceeded the speed limit by between 12 and 15, inclusive, miles per hour, $40;
2. If the citation alleges that the driver of the motor vehicle
exceeded the speed limit by between 16 and 19, inclusive, miles per hour, $70;

HOUSE BILL 401
3. If the citation alleges that the driver of the motor vehicle
exceeded the speed limit by between 20 and 29, inclusive, miles per hour, $120;
4. If the citation alleges that the driver of the motor vehicle
exceeded the speed limit by between 30 and 39, inclusive, miles per hour, $230; and
5. If the citation alleges that the driver of the motor vehicle
exceeded the speed limit by 40 miles per hour or more, $425.
(ii) A civil penalty under this paragraph for a violation recorded on
Interstate 83 in Baltimore County or Interstate 695 in Baltimore County may not exceed
$40.
(iii) 1. This paragraph applies to a civil penalty assessed to the
owner or driver of a motor vehicle that is recorded by a speed monitoring system while
being operated on Maryland Route 210 (Piscataway Highway) in Prince George’s County
in violation of this subtitle.
2. The maximum civil penalty under this subparagraph is as
follows:
A. For exceeding the maximum posted speed limit by
between 12 and 15, inclusive, miles per hour, $40;
B. For exceeding the maximum posted speed limit by
between 16 and 19, inclusive, miles per hour, $70;
C. For exceeding the maximum posted speed limit by
between 20 and 29, inclusive, miles per hour, $120;
D. For exceeding the maximum posted speed limit by
between 30 and 39, inclusive, miles per hour, $230; or
E. For exceeding the maximum posted speed limit by 40
miles per hour or more, $425.
(3) For purposes of this section, the District Court shall prescribe:
(i) A uniform citation form consistent with subsection (d)(1) of this
section and § 7–302 of the Courts Article; and
(ii) A civil penalty, which shall be indicated on the citation, to be paid
by persons who choose to prepay the civil penalty without appearing in District Court.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.